Illinois, session 104th, SB2804.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Video streaming services; advertisement 8volume.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Video programming" has the meaning set forth in 47 U.S.C. 11613(h)(2).12    "Video streaming service" means an entity that makes 13available directly to the consumer, through a distribution 14method that uses Internet protocol, video programming or video 15content the entity makes available for users to view. "Video 16streaming service" does not include a television broadcast 17station, cable operator, or other multichannel video 18programming distributor, or an entity that serves video 19programming or video content without commercial 20advertisements.21    (b) On and after January 1, 2027, a video streaming 22service that serves consumers residing in this State shall not 23transmit the audio of commercial advertisements louder than   SB2804- 2 -LRB104 17176 SPS 30595 b1the video content the advertisements accompany, consistent 2with the regulations adopted by the Federal Communications 3Commission under the Commercial Advertisement Loudness 4Mitigation (CALM) Act (Public Law 111-311) for television 5broadcast stations, cable operators, and other multichannel 6video programming distributors.7    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 8practice within the meaning of this Act.